Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 3

Financially Distressed Municipalities,
Counties, Utility Districts and
Education Agencies

9-13-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Financially Distressed Municipalities, Counties, Utility Districts and Education Agencies Act of 1993.”

Acts 1993, ch. 76, § 1.

9-13-302. Duties of the comptroller of the treasury.

The comptroller of the treasury shall develop and recommend statutory changes, policies, and procedures for the purpose of:

Promptly identifying financially distressed municipalities, counties, utility districts and education agencies;

Providing for the timely restructuring of the debt of such municipalities, counties, utility districts and education agencies;

Considering the need for temporary loans or other fiscal adjustments to prevent fiscal crisis; and

Providing for consolidation or merger of contiguous municipalities, counties, utility districts or education agencies, or for the merger of functions of such entities in order to relieve financial distress.

Acts 1993, ch. 76, § 2.